Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6
ELECTION RETURNS

1-7-601. Judges' certificate and statement.

As soon as all the votes have been read and counted, either at the precincts or at the electronic balloting counting centers, the election judges shall make a certificate for each precinct, stating the name of each candidate, the office for which that candidate received votes, and stating the number of votes each candidate received. The number shall be expressed in numerical figures. The entry shall be made, as nearly as circumstances will permit, in the following form:

At an election held ...................., in precinct ......, in the county of .................... and state of Colorado, on the .................... day of .................... in the year ......, the following named candidates received the number of votes annexed to their respective names for the following described offices: Total number of ballots or votes cast was ..... A.B. and E.F. had 72 votes for governor and lieutenant governor; C.D. and G.H. had 69 votes for governor and lieutenant governor; J.K. had 68 votes for representative in congress; L.M. had 70 votes for representative in congress; N.O. had 72 votes for state representative; P.Q. had 71 votes for state representative; R.S. had 84 votes for sheriff; T.W. had 60 votes for sheriff; (and the same manner for any other persons voted for).

Certified by us:

C.D. )

E.F. ) Election Judges

(1.5) In addition to the information required by subsection (1) of this section, the certificate prepared by the election judges for each precinct shall state the ballot title and submission clause of any ballot issue or ballot question voted upon in the election and the number of votes counted for and against the ballot issue or ballot question.

(2) In addition, the election judges shall make a written statement showing the number of ballots voted, making a separate statement of the number of unofficial and substitute ballots voted, the number of ballots delivered to electors, the number of spoiled ballots, the number of ballots not delivered to electors, and the number of ballots returned, identifying and specifying the same. All unused ballots, spoiled ballots, and stubs of ballots voted shall be returned with the statement.

(3) Any judges' certificates and statements may be combined into one document if so directed by the designated election official.

B. )

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 750, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) added, p. 1422, § 78, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1980, § 30, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-310 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-602. Judges to post returns. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 750, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1359, § 23, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-603. Alternative preparation of election returns - procedures.

If any designated election official wishes to count the votes cast at a location or by a method other than authorized by this code, the designated election official may present a plan, for approval by the secretary of state, that delineates the process for assuring accuracy and confidentiality of counting. The plan shall be submitted to the secretary of state and approved no later than forty-five days before the election at which the plan is to be implemented.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1422, § 79, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 775, § 52, effective May 20.